Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Financing.

§ 55.1-2235.
Financing of time-share programs.

In the developer’s financing of a time-share program, the developer shall retain financial records of the schedule of payments required to be made and the payments made by it to any person or entity that is the holder of an underlying blanket mortgage, deed of trust, contract of sale, or other lien or encumbrance.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-387; 1985, c. 517; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2236.
Purchaser’s rights under developer’s foreclosure.

The developer whose project is subject to an underlying blanket lien or encumbrance shall protect a nondefaulting purchaser from foreclosure or cancellation by the lien holder by securing from such lien holder or recording of a nondisturbance clause, subordination agreement, or partial release of the lien as to that time-share sold to such purchaser.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-388; 1985, c. 517; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2237.
Protection of lien holder.

Any lien holder of a time-share interest in any time-share program shall have the following rights:

The lien holder shall have its lien rights preserved as against any purchaser of a time-share who claims that the time-share instrument is invalid, void, or voidable, 30 days after written notice by certified mail or personal delivery has been given by the developer or lien holder to the purchaser. The notice shall state that the developer has assigned the receivables to the lien holder and that the purchaser has 30 days within which to object and specify the invalidity or defect contained within such time-share instrument. The notice required by this section may be included in the blanket encumbrance, in the contract, or in any note, deed of trust, or mortgage executed by the purchaser in connection with the purchaser’s deferred purchase of a time-share.

Any purchaser who fails to indicate that the time-share instrument is invalid, void, or voidable as provided in subdivision 1 waives, or is estopped to raise, the same in any subsequent enforcement of the collection of the receivable by the lien holder.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-389; 1985, c. 517; 1998, c. 460; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.